District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-3504

Penalty; conditions imposed by court.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 17, 1941, 55 Stat. 809, ch. 589, § 3
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 216, 56 DCR 7413

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3304.
1973 Ed., § 22-3304.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).
For Law 18-88, see notes following § 22-402.